Massachusetts, session 194th, S795.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 19X of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “of” in line 2 the following
words:- “all conflicts of interest, whether direct or indirect; and”
SECTION 2. Said section 19X of chapter 175 is hereby amended by inserting at the end
of subsection (a) the following words:- “At least once every 3 years, a proxy or consent or
authorization or solicitation or notice of an annual meeting, in a form of which the commissioner
of insurance shall determine, of a mutual company shall include a separate resolution subject to a
non-binding vote to approve or disapprove the compensation of the named executive officers or
directors. The commissioner shall promulgate regulations with the express purpose of increasing
of 2

transparency in executive compensation and which are necessary to carry out the provisions of
this section.".
of 2